California statutes. Insurance Code
(a) There is hereby created the Arson Information Reporting System to permit insurers, law enforcement agencies, fire investigative agencies, and district attorneys to deposit arson case information in a common data base within the Department of Justice. The State Fire Marshal shall oversee the establishment, operation, and maintenance of the Arson Information Reporting System. The Department of Justice shall implement the Arson Information Reporting System in consultation with the State Fire Marshal.

(b) The purpose of the data base is to identify utilization patterns by individual claimants and the methods of operation of individuals, groups, or businesses engaged in the commission of arson, and to prevent the commission of insurance fraud by arson.

(c) The use of the information deposited pursuant to this article shall be made available to law enforcement agencies, fire investigative agencies, district attorneys, and insurers, via modem, for the purpose of investigating and prosecuting arson and arson-related insurance fraud, or evaluating the validity and payment of fire-related insurance claims. The State Fire Marshal shall establish rules governing the access to, and use of, information and the circumstances under which information may be accessed and corrected.

(d) Any information acquired pursuant to this section shall not be a part of any public record. Except as otherwise provided by law, any authorized governmental agency, an insurer, or an agent authorized by an insurer to act on its behalf, which receives any information furnished pursuant to this section, shall not release that information to public inspection until the time that its release is required in connection with a criminal or civil proceeding.

(e) Information submitted to the State Fire Marshal pursuant to this section concerning active cases shall be confidential.

(f) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the accumulation and public distribution by the bureau of statistical data if that data does not reveal the identity of specific claimants, injured parties, attorneys, physicians, or other service providers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 420, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Insurance Claims Analysis Bureaus [1875.10. - 1875.18.]

1875.10.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) That the business of insurance involves many transactions which have potential for abuse and illegal activities.

(b) That insurers and their policyholders ultimately pay the cost of fraudulent insurance claims.

(c) That the operation of insurance claims analysis bureaus would be to the benefit of the public, regulators, law enforcement, prosecutors, and insurers in suppressing and preventing insurance claims fraud.

(d) That the purpose of insurance claims analysis bureaus is to provide a data service to encourage the identification of utilization patterns by individuals or businesses who provide services in support of insurance claims, and by individual claimants themselves, in order to facilitate the identification and prevention of fraudulent activities.

(e) That promotion of an effective public-private partnership between the insurance industry and the commissioner to share data on suspected fraudulent claims is necessary to avoid unnecessary duplication and expense in reporting that data.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that, to promote a data-sharing partnership that is efficient and cost-effective, the commissioner and the bureau make every effort to obtain suspected fraudulent claims data from reporting and collection sources already in existence and supported by the insurance industry, by licensing those sources as claims analysis bureaus, as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1247, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1875.11.

(a) No insurance claims analysis bureau shall conduct any operations in this state without first filing a written application with the commissioner and obtaining a license to act in that capacity. 

(b) As used in this section, an insurance claims analysis bureau is an organization, duly licensed pursuant to this article, which collects claims information and data from and disseminates claims information and data to its members or subscribers which is utilized for the purpose of the prevention and suppression of insurance fraud.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1222, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1875.12.

(a) The commissioner may license an organization as an insurance claims analysis bureau if it meets the following qualifications:

(1) Is a nonprofit corporation organized for the purpose of fraud prevention or is a corporation that has made the filings required by Section 1855.2.

(2) Has at least two years of experience, or has a managing officer with at least two years of experience, determined by the commissioner to be relevant to operation of an insurance claims analysis bureau, or has at least two years’ experience collecting and compiling insurance statistical information.

(3) Has a member or subscriber base of sufficient size that is, in the opinion of the commissioner, adequate to assure uniformity in data collection and cost efficiency to the insurer. 

(4) Maintains its records in a computerized format. 

(b) An applicant seeking a license as an insurance claims analysis bureau shall file with the commissioner the following documents:

(1) A copy of its articles of incorporation, its bylaws, and any rules and regulations governing the conduct of its business. 

(2) A list of members or subscribers. 

(3) A description of its technical capacity to collect and serve the volume of data necessary to act as an insurance claims analysis bureau. 

(4) A statement establishing that the applicant meets the conditions set forth in subdivision (a). 

(5) A certificate signed by an officer of the applicant that it will permit any licensed insurer to become a member or subscriber to the insurance claims analysis bureau.

(6) A statement of all of the following:

(A) That it will provide admitted insurers subject to Article 6 (commencing with Section 1876) the ability to submit required information to the claims analysis bureau at no cost to the insurer, and also provide nonmember or nonsubscriber insurers, at no cost to the insurer, any software that is specifically designed for the purpose of submitting information electronically that the bureau requires its insurers to use.

(B) That information from its data base will be made available to state law enforcement agencies pursuant to existing law, and that it will be made available at no cost to those agencies.

(c) This section shall not be interpreted to provide any nonmember or nonsubscriber any rights of membership or subscription in an organization licensed as an insurance claims analysis bureau.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 501, Sec. 2.8.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1875.13.

The commissioner shall license an insurance claims analysis bureau by class of claims, if an insurance claims analysis bureau makes application and is appropriately qualified, for the following classes of claims:

(a) Automobile bodily injury, which shall include liability, uninsured motorist, and medical payment. 

(b) Automobile physical damage.

(c) Automobile theft. 

(d) Fire and allied lines property damage. 

(e) General liability bodily injury. 

(f) Disability. 

(g) Life. 

(h) Workers’ compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1222, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1875.14.

An insurance claims analysis bureau shall perform the following functions:

(a) Collect and compile information and data from members or subscribers concerning insurance claims. 

(b) Disseminate information to members or subscribers relating to insurance claims for the purpose of preventing and suppressing insurance fraud. 

(c) Promote training and education to further insurer investigation, suppression, and prosecution of insurance fraud. 

(d) Provide, without fee or charge, to the commissioner, all California data and information contained in the records of the insurance claims analysis bureau in furtherance of the prevention and prosecution of insurance fraud.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1222, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1875.15.

(a) A licensed insurance claims analysis bureau shall develop rules governing the kind, quality, and frequency of data reporting, which shall be binding on all subscribers or members. The commissioner may require development of new claims categories for the suppression and prevention of fraud. 

(b) Every member or subscriber shall report, at a minimum, the following regarding any category of claims:

(1) Name of claimant.

(2) Address of claimant.

(3) Date of accident or incident.

(4) Identification of medical provider, if applicable.

(5) Identification of property repair vendor, if applicable.

(6) Identification of members or subscribers and, if applicable, adjusters.

(7) Identification of attorneys representing claimants, if applicable.

(8) Description of claim.

(9) Claimant’s driver license or California Identification card number, if applicable.

(10) Claimant’s social security number, if known to the insurer.

(11) Vehicle license numbers, if the claim involves automobile insurance.

(12) Vehicle identification numbers, if known and the claim involves automobile insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1248, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1875.16.

Unless otherwise provided by law, any authorized entity which receives any information furnished pursuant to this article shall not release that information to public inspection (1) until such time as its release is required in connection with a criminal or civil proceeding, or (2) is necessary to analyze and present information for release in an insurance claims analysis bureau’s annual report. Any information acquired pursuant to this article shall not be part of any public record nor subject to disclosure under the California Public Records Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1222, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1875.17.

On or before May 1, 1992, and on or before May 1 of each year thereafter, any licensed insurance claims analysis bureau shall file with the department a report on the scope and extent of its activities in this state for the preceding year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1222, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1875.18.

(a) Every bodily injury, medical payment, or uninsured motorist claim made under a policy of automobile insurance shall be available, upon request, to law enforcement agencies in this state, whenever that claim relates to an event that occurred within the state.

(b) Every claim subject to subdivision (a) shall be available without regard to any limitation in the Insurance Information and Privacy Protection Act (Article 6.6 (commencing with Section 791) of Chapter 1), or any other provision of law, whether or not the law enforcement agency has formed a reasonable belief that a violation of law may have occurred with regard to the claim.

(c) (1) A licensed insurance claims analysis bureau shall provide automobile claims information, upon request, to a law enforcement agency pursuant to the authority in subdivision (a).

(2) A licensed insurance claims analysis bureau, and any person employed therein, that provides information pursuant to this section shall have the same immunity provided under Section 791.21 as any person disclosing personal or privileged information under Article 6.6 (commencing with Section 791) of Chapter 1.

(d) (1) Claims information requested by law enforcement agencies, pursuant to the authority in this section, shall be used solely for the purpose of investigating and prosecuting automobile insurance fraud. Those requests shall be narrowly formulated in order to protect the privacy rights of citizens of this state, while obtaining the information necessary to conduct specific investigations.

(2) The commissioner shall establish rules governing the access to, and use of, any information requested or obtained pursuant to this section, and the circumstances under which that information may be inspected and corrected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 501, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.6. Insurer Fraud Investigation [1875.20. - 1875.24.]

1875.20.

Every insurer admitted to do business in this state, except those otherwise exempted in this code, shall provide for the continuous operation of a unit or division to investigate possible fraudulent claims by insureds or by persons making claims for services or repairs against policies held by insureds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 717, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1875.21.

Insurers may maintain the unit or division required by this article using its employees or by contracting with others for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1222, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1875.22.

Insurers shall establish the unit or division required by this article no later than July 1, 1992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1222, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1875.23.

For purposes of this article, “unit or division” may include the assignment of fraud investigation to employees whose principal responsibilities are the investigation and disposition of claims. If an insurer creates a distinct unit or division, hires additional employees, or contracts with another entity to fulfill the requirements of this article, the additional cost incurred shall be included as an administrative expense for ratesetting purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1222, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1875.24.

(a) If after examination, or upon the basis of other information, the commissioner has good cause to believe that an insurer to whom the provisions of this article apply does not comply with the requirements of this article, or with the regulations set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 2698.30) of Subchapter 9 of Chapter 5 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations, the commissioner shall notify the insurer of its noncompliance. The notice shall state in what manner and to what extent the noncompliance is alleged to exist, shall specify a reasonable time, not less than 10 days thereafter, in which the noncompliance may be corrected, and shall set forth the amount of any penalty that may be due under subdivision (b).

(b) Any insurer that fails to comply with the provisions of this article or with the regulations described in subdivision (a) shall be liable to the state for a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each act, or, if the act was willful, a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each act. The commissioner shall have the discretion to determine what constitutes an act. However, when violations relative to the maintenance and operation of the unit or division are inadvertent, the violations shall be considered a single act for the purpose of this section. Any penalty imposed by the commissioner pursuant to this section shall be determined as provided in subdivision (d) of this section and Article 19 (commencing with Section 2591) of Subchapter 3 of Chapter 5 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations. Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 2591.1 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations, enforcement of any provision of this section shall be deemed an enforcement action pursuant to Article 19 (commencing with Section 2591) of Subchapter 3 of Chapter 5 of that title.

(c) An insurer served with a notice of noncompliance described herein shall, within the time specified therein, do one or more of the following:

(1) Establish to the satisfaction of the commissioner that the noncompliance does not exist.

(2) Request a hearing, notice of which must be given at least 30 days prior to the date set for a hearing.

(3) Enter into a consent order with the commissioner to correct the specified noncompliance within the time period specified in the consent order.

(d) If, after hearing, the commissioner finds that the facts alleged in the notice of noncompliance are true, he or she shall issue an order requiring compliance with the provisions of this article within a reasonable time. An insurer that fails to comply with an order issued by the commissioner, including a consent order, shall be liable to the state for a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each day the insurer fails to comply with the provisions of the order. Any order, including any consent order, issued pursuant to this section shall specify the amount of the penalty due under subdivision (b), and shall indicate that an additional penalty shall be imposed for each day the insurer fails to comply with the order within the time specified therein. In addition to any other remedy provided by statute, regulation, or otherwise, the commissioner may direct the insurer to take any other corrective action that he or she may deem necessary and proper.

(e) The commissioner shall adopt regulations necessary to implement this section in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 596, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Deposit of Automobile Insurance Claims Information [1876. - 1876.5.]

1876.

Every insurer who receives a bodily injury, medical payment, or uninsured motorist claim made under a policy of automobile liability insurance defined in Section 660 or Section 11622 shall within 20 days of the receipt of that claim deposit that claim information with a licensed insurance claims analysis bureau. The claims information deposited pursuant to this section shall include at least the following: (1) the claimant’s driver’s license number or California identification card number, if applicable; (2) the vehicle license number; (3) the vehicle identification number, if known; and (4) the claimant’s social security number, if known to the insurer.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1876.2 by Stats. 1997, Ch. 501, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1876.3.

Any information acquired pursuant to this article shall not be part of any public record except as follows: Except as otherwise provided by law, any authorized governmental agency, and insurer, or an agent authorized by an insurer to act on its behalf, which receives any information furnished pursuant to this article shall not release that information to public inspection until such time as its release is required in connection with a criminal or civil proceeding; to analyze and present information for release in the bureau’s annual report pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1872.9.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the accumulation and public distribution by the bureau of statistical data if that data does not reveal the identity of specific claimants, injured parties, attorneys, physicians, or other service providers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1222, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

1876.4.

No insurer, or the employees or agents of any insurer, shall be subject to civil liability for libel, slander, or any other tort cause of action arising from the deposit or furnishing of any information or data pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1119, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1876.5.

As used in this article, “authorized governmental agency” and “insurer” have the same meaning as is given by Section 1874.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1119, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Workers’ Compensation Insurance Fraud Reporting [1877. - 1877.5.]

1877.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the Workers’ Compensation Insurance Fraud Reporting Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 116, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

1877.1.

The following definitions govern the construction of this article, unless the context requires otherwise:

(a) “Authorized governmental agency” means the district attorney of any county, any city attorney whose duties include criminal prosecutions, any law enforcement agency investigating workers’ compensation fraud, the office of the Attorney General, the Department of Insurance, the Department of Industrial Relations, the Employment Development Department, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Public Employees’ Retirement System, and any licensing agency governed by the Business and Professions Code.

(b) “Relevant” means having a tendency to make the existence of any fact that is of consequence to the investigation or determination of an issue more probable or less probable than it would be without the information.

(c) “Insurer” means an insurer admitted to transact workers’ compensation insurance in this state, the State Compensation Insurance Fund, an employer that has secured a certificate of consent to self-insure pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 3700 of the Labor Code, or a third-party administrator that has secured a certificate pursuant to Section 3702.1 of the Labor Code.

(d) “Licensed rating organization” means a rating organization licensed by the Insurance Commissioner pursuant to Section 11750.1.

(e) Information shall be deemed important if, within the sole discretion of the authorized governmental agency, that information is requested by that authorized governmental agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 369, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1877.2.

For the purposes of this article, “authorized governmental agency” includes, in addition to the entities listed in subdivision (a) of Section 1877.1, any licensing agency governed by the Chiropractic Initiative Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 415, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1877.3.

(a) Upon written request to an insurer or a licensed rating organization by an authorized governmental agency, an insurer, an agent authorized by that insurer, or a licensed rating organization to act on behalf of the insurer, shall release to the requesting authorized governmental agency any or all relevant information deemed important to the authorized governmental agency that the insurer or licensed rating organization may possess relating to any specific workers’ compensation insurance fraud investigation.

(b) (1) When an insurer or licensed rating organization knows or reasonably believes it knows the identity of a person or entity whom it has reason to
 believe committed a fraudulent act relating to a workers’ compensation insurance claim or a workers’ compensation insurance policy, including any policy application, or has knowledge of such a fraudulent act, then, for the purpose of notification and investigation, the insurer, or agent authorized by an insurer to act on its behalf, or licensed rating organization shall notify the local district attorney’s office and the Fraud Division of the Department of Insurance, and may notify any other authorized governmental agency of that suspected fraud and provide any additional information in accordance with subdivision (a). The insurer or licensed rating organization shall state in its notice the basis of the suspected fraud.

(2) Insurers shall use a form prescribed by the department for the purposes of reporting suspected fraudulent
 workers’ compensation acts pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) This section does not abrogate or impair the rights or powers created under subdivision (a).

(c) The authorized governmental agency provided with information pursuant to subdivision (a), (b), or (e) shall, upon request, unless it would violate federal law or otherwise compromise an investigation, release or provide that information in a confidential manner to any other authorized governmental agency for purposes of investigation, prosecution, or prevention of insurance fraud or workers’ compensation fraud.

(d) An insurer or licensed rating organization providing information to an authorized governmental agency pursuant to this section shall provide
 the information within a reasonable time, but not exceeding 60 days from the day on which the duty arose.

(e) Upon written request by an authorized governmental agency, as specified in subdivision (o) of Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, the Employment Development Department shall release to the requesting agency any or all relevant information that the Employment Development Department may possess relating to any specific workers’ compensation insurance fraud investigation. If an authorized governmental agency seeks to disclose this information to any other governmental agency that is not authorized to receive that information pursuant to subdivision (o) of Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code or subdivision (c) of Section 603.9 of Title 20 of the Code of Federal Regulations, that agency shall submit a request to
 the Employment Development Department for approval prior to disclosure. Relevant information may include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Copies of unemployment and disability insurance application and claim forms and copies of any supporting medical records, documentation, and records pertaining thereto.

(2) Copies of returns filed by an employer pursuant to Section 1088 of the Unemployment Insurance Code and copies of supporting documentation.

(3) Copies of benefit payment checks issued to claimants.

(4) Copies of any documentation that specifically identifies the claimant by social security number, residence address, or telephone number.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 204, Sec. 13.   (AB 1140)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1877.35.

(a) The Public Employees’ Retirement System may request information from an insurer for any specific investigation of eligibility for, and unlawful application or receipt of, benefits provided under Part 3 (commencing with Section 20000) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Information received by the Public Employees’ Retirement System pursuant to this article may be used for purposes of determining eligibility for, and unlawful application or receipt of, benefits provided under Part 3 (commencing with Section 20000) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 369, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1877.4.

(a) Any information acquired pursuant to this article shall not be a part of the public record. Except as otherwise provided by law, any authorized governmental agency, an insurer, or an agent authorized to act on its behalf, which receives any information furnished pursuant to this article shall not release that information to any person not authorized to receive the information under this article. Any person who violates the prohibition of this subdivision is guilty of a misdemeanor. 

(b) The evidence or information described in this section shall be privileged and shall not be subject to subpoena or subpoena duces tecum in a civil or criminal proceeding, unless, after reasonable notice to any insurer, an agent authorized by an insurer to act on its behalf, licensed rating organization, or authorized governmental agency which has an interest in the information, and a hearing, the court determines that the public interest and any ongoing investigation by the authorized governmental agency, insurer, or an agent authorized by the insurer to act on its behalf, or licensed rating organization will not be jeopardized by its disclosure, or by the issuance of and compliance with a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 636, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1877.5.

No insurer, agent authorized by an insurer to act on its behalf, or licensed rating organization who furnishes information, written or oral, pursuant to this article, and no authorized governmental agency or its employees who (a) furnishes or receives information, written or oral, pursuant to this article, or (b) assists in any investigation of a suspected violation of Section 1871.1, 1871.4, 11760, or 11880, or of Section 549 of the Penal Code, or of Section 3215 or 3219 of the Labor Code conducted by an authorized governmental agency, shall be subject to any civil liability in a cause or action of any kind where the insurer, authorized agent, licensed rating organization, or authorized governmental agency acts in good faith, without malice, and reasonably believes that the action taken was warranted by the then known facts, obtained by reasonable efforts. Nothing in this chapter is intended to, nor does in any way or manner, abrogate or lessen the existing common law or statutory privileges and immunities of an insurer, agent authorized by that insurer to act on its behalf, licensed rating organization, or any authorized governmental agency or its employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 636, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Insurance Fraud Prevention [1879. - 1879.8.]

1879.

The purpose of this article is to confront aggressively the problem of insurance fraud in this state by facilitating the detection of insurance fraud, eliminating the occurrence of fraud through the development of fraud prevention programs, requiring the restitution of fraudulently obtained insurance benefits, and reducing the amount of premium dollars used to pay fraudulent claims.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1008, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1879.1.

(a) The commissioner or their designated deputy commissioner may convene meetings with representatives of insurance companies or representatives of self-insured employers to discuss specific information concerning suspected, anticipated, or completed acts of insurance
 fraud.

(b) A district attorney may convene meetings with representatives of insurance companies or representatives of self-insured employers to discuss specific information concerning suspected, anticipated, or completed acts of insurance fraud. The commissioner, their designated deputy commissioner, or designated employees of the department from the department’s Fraud Division or the department’s legal division shall attend such a meeting. Only one meeting per month may be convened pursuant to this subdivision. If more than one district attorney seeks to convene a meeting in a given month or a district attorney seeks to convene more than one meeting in a given month, then the commissioner shall choose which meeting the
 commissioner, their designated deputy commissioner, or designated employees of the department shall attend.

(c) The party that convenes a meeting pursuant to this section may invite a district attorney to participate in the meeting if the suspected, anticipated, or completed acts of insurance fraud to be discussed at the meeting previously occurred or may occur in the county that the district attorney represents.

 (d) Information shared at a meeting convened pursuant to this section regarding specific suspected, anticipated, or completed acts of insurance fraud shall not make a person subject to civil liability for libel, slander, or any other relevant cause of action provided that all of the following requirements are met at the meeting:

(1) The commissioner, their designated deputy commissioner, or designated employees of the department from the department’s Fraud Division or the department’s legal division are present at the meeting or meetings.

(2) The commissioner, their designated deputy commissioner, or a designated employee of the department from the department’s Fraud Division or the department’s legal division advises meeting participants, at the beginning of any meeting convened pursuant to this section, of guidelines to ensure compliance with federal and state antitrust laws.

(3) There is no fraud or malice on the part of any of the following attending the meeting:

(A) The representatives of the insurance companies.

(B) The representatives of the self-insured employers.

(C) The commissioner, their designated deputy commissioner, or designated employees of the department.

(D) Any district attorney or their employees.

(e) A report of a fraudulent claim made by an insurance company under Section 1872.4 or made by a self-insured employer under Section 1877.3 that is based on information obtained at a meeting convened pursuant to this section shall comply with all requirements set forth in Section 1872.4 or 1877.3, as applicable, as well as Article 2 of Subchapter 9 of Chapter 5 of Title 10 of the California Code of
 Regulations and all other applicable regulations.

(f) If the commissioner reasonably believes or knows that a fraudulent claim is being made based on information obtained at a meeting convened pursuant to this section, the commissioner may share this information with any district attorney with whom the department has entered into a written agreement for the investigation and prosecution of insurance fraud.

(g) A district attorney may be represented at a meeting convened
 pursuant to this section only by employees who are licensees of the State Bar of California.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 861, Sec. 3.   (AB 1681)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1879.3.

The commissioner shall appoint supervisory and investigatory personnel within the bureau. In addition, the commissioner shall assign staff counsel who are employed by the department and are under the supervision of the department’s general counsel to advise the department’s fraud division, and to further the purposes of this article and Article 1 (commencing with Section 1871). The attorneys’ duties may include representing the commissioner and the department in civil lawsuits pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 1871). Those persons shall be qualified by training and experience to perform the duties of their position.

When so requested by the commissioner, the Attorney General may assign one or more deputy attorneys general to assist the commissioner in the performance of these duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 380, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1879.4.

(a) The Chief of the Fraud Division and those investigators designated by him or her may expend funds to conduct undercover activities, employ civilian operatives, or in any other manner not prohibited by law to investigate insurance fraud or workers’ compensation fraud.

(b) The money expended pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be paid out of the funds appropriated or made available by law for the support or use of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 717, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1879.5.

(a) Any person who believes that a violation of this article has been or is being made may notify the department immediately after discovery of the alleged violation and may send to the department, on a form and in a manner prescribed by the commissioner, the information requested and any additional information relative to the alleged violation as the department may request. The division shall review the reports and select those alleged violations as may require further investigation. It shall then cause an independent examination or evaluation of the facts surrounding the alleged violation to be made to determine the extent, if any, to which fraud, deceit, or intentional misrepresentation of any kind exists.

(b) No person shall be subject to civil liability for libel, violation of privacy, or otherwise by virtue of the filing of reports or furnishing of other information, in good faith and without malice, provided pursuant to this section or requested by the department as a result of the authority conferred upon it by law.

(c) The commissioner may, by regulation, require admitted insurers to keep any records and other information as he or she deems necessary for the effective enforcement of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1008, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1879.6.

The commissioner may adopt administrative regulations as he or she deems necessary for the effective implementation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1008, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1879.7.

The commissioner shall report annually to the Legislature as to the activities of the department and the cost-effectiveness of the programs established pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1008, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1879.8.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to preclude the applicability of any other provision of civil or criminal law that applies to any act committed or alleged to have been committed by any person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1008, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 2. CLASSES OF INSURANCE [1880. - 12880.8.]



PART 1. FIRE AND MARINE INSURANCE [1880. - 10108.1.]



  CHAPTER 1. The Marine Contract [1880. - 2010.]



  ARTICLE 1. Insurable Interests Peculiar to Marine Insurance [1880. - 1886.]

1880.

The owner of a ship has in all cases an insurable interest in it, even when it has been chartered by one who agrees to pay him its value in case of loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1881.

The insurable interest of the owner of a ship hypothecated by bottomry is only the excess of its value over the amount secured by bottomry.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1882.

Freightage, in marine insurance, signifies all the benefit derived by the owner, either from the chartering of the ship or its employment for the carriage of his own goods or those of others.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1883.

The owner of a ship has an insurable interest in expected freightage which he would have certainly earned but for the intervention of a peril insured against.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

1884.

The interest mentioned in the last section exists, in the case of a charter party, when the ship has broken ground on the chartered voyage. If a price is to be paid for the carriage of goods it exists when they are actually on board, or there is some contract for putting them on board, and both ship and goods are ready for the specified voyage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)